District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-201

Distinctive markings.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1917, 39 Stat. 1010, ch. 160
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-223, § 202, 59 DCR 13537

Cross References

Motor vehicle exhaust emissions inspections, government vehicles, see § 50-1104.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-901.
1973 Ed., § 40-501.

Editor's Notes

Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-223 provided that §§ 101, 102, 104, 105(a), 105(b), 106, 107, 201(a), 201(b), 201(c), 202, 203, and 301 of the act shall apply as of Mar. 5, 2013.

Because of the codification of D.C. Law 19-223, §§ 101 to 107 as subchapter II of this chapter, the preexisting text, §§ 50-201 to 50-205, has been designated as subchapter I.